src/phonetics/acro2ipa.xfscript
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!  ==========================================
!! Phonological ACRO converter for Julev Sámi
!! ==========================================

!! Converts ACROS to IPA. Intended for use with TTS.
!!
!! `>` marks undlying morpheme boundary between lemma and inflectional suffix,
!! `:` is the same, but in the surface orthography. The idea is that the
!! pronunciation of the last letter sound (like `e:` when reading the letter
!! `P`) can be different when followed by a case ending compared to when not.
!! If that is not true, the system can be simplified.

! Word-like acros have structures like:
!  CVC: NAV, RÁB, FUG, VUK
! CCVC: KRAV
!   VCVCCV: UNESCO
!  VCVC: ISAF, EDAG
! CVCV: SIVA
! Aldri lange vokalar eller diftongar - men kva med slike som funkar på norsk/svensk/samisk?

! Tvil:
!  VC: AN  - aa ænn eller /a:n/?
! CVV: FAU - eff aa uu eller /fau/?
! CCV: CRU - see ærr uu ellere /kru/?

! Desse skal lesast bokstav for bokstav:
! EU, OECD, NOU, EØS

! Problem-acroar:
! - dynamisk samansetjing; IKT-ådåstuhttemij, AN-jådeduvvam, NAV-kontåvrråjn

! IPA consonants
define ICONS [ b | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | p | r | s | t | v ] ;

! IPA vowels
define IVOWS [ i | y | e | æ | a | ɔ | o | ø | u | ʉ ] ;

! Orthographic consonants
define OCONS [ B | C | D | F | G | H | J | K | L | M | N | Ŋ | P | Q  R | S | T | V | W | X | Z
             | b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | ŋ | p | q  r | s | t | v | w | x | z
] ;

! Orthographic vowels
define OVOWS [ A | E | I | O | U | Y | Æ | Ø | Å 
             | a | e | i | o | u | y | æ | ø | å ] ;

define CVC [ OCONS OVOWS OCONS ] ;

define CCVC [ OCONS CVC ] ;

define VCVCCV [ VCV (OCONS) OCONS OVOWS ] ;

define VCV [ OVOWS OCONS OVOWS ] ;

define VCVC [ VCV OCONS ] ;
define CVCV [ OCONS VCV ] ;

define wordacromarker [ [..] -> "_WORD" || .#. [ CVC
                                              | CCVC
                                              | VCV
                                              | VCVC
                                              | CVCV
                                              | VCVCCV
                                              ] ( [ ">" | ":" ] \[ ">" | ":" ]+ ) _ .#.
] ;

!! Default, letter by letter pronunciation
define letter2sound [
  A -> a ː   ,
  a -> a ː   ,
  Á -> ɑ ː   ,
  á -> ɑ ː   ,
  B -> b e ː ,
  b -> b e ː ,
  C -> c e ː ,
  c -> c e ː ,
  D -> d e ː ,
  d -> d e ː ,
  E -> e ː   ,
  e -> e ː   ,
  F -> æ f ː ,
  f -> æ f ː ,
  G -> g e ː ,
  g -> g e ː ,
  H -> h ɔ ː ,
  h -> h ɔ ː ,
  I -> i ː   ,
  i -> i ː   ,
  J -> j e ː ,
  j -> j e ː ,
  K -> k ɔ ː ,
  k -> k ɔ ː ,
  L -> æ l ː ,
  l -> æ l ː ,
  M -> æ m ː ,
  m -> æ m ː ,
  N -> æ n ː ,
  n -> æ n ː ,
  Ŋ -> æ ŋ ː ,
  ŋ -> æ ŋ ː ,
  O -> u ː   ,
  o -> u ː   ,
  P -> p e ː ,
  p -> p e ː ,
  Q -> q ʉ ː ,
  q -> q ʉ ː ,
  R -> æ r ː ,
  r -> æ r ː ,
  S -> æ s ː ,
  s -> æ s ː ,
  T -> t e ː ,
  t -> t e ː ,
  U -> u ː   ,
  u -> u ː   ,
  V -> v e ː ,
  v -> v e ː ,
  W -> d ɔ b ː e l t v e ː ,
  w -> d ɔ b ː e l t v e ː ,
  X -> æ k s ,
  x -> æ k s ,
  Y -> y ː ,
  y -> y ː ,
  Z -> s æ t ː ,
  z -> s æ t ː ,
  Æ -> æ ː ,
  æ -> æ ː ,
  Ä -> æ ː ,
  ä -> æ ː ,
  Ø -> ø ː ,
  ø -> ø ː ,
  Ö -> ø ː ,
  ö -> ø ː ,
  Å -> ɔ ː ,
  å -> ɔ ː || .#. \[ ">" | ":" ]* _ \[ ">" | ":" ]* [ ">" | ":" ] \"_WORD" .#.
] ;

define word2sound [
  A -> a ː ,
  a -> a ː ,
  Á -> ɑ ː ,
  á -> ɑ ː ,
  B -> b ,
  b -> b ,
  C -> c ,
  c -> c ,
  D -> d ,
  d -> d ,
  E -> e ː ,
  e -> e ː ,
  F -> f ,
  f -> f ,
  G -> g ,
  g -> g ,
  H -> h ,
  h -> h ,
  I -> i ː ,
  i -> i ː ,
  J -> j ,
  j -> j ,
  K -> k ,
  k -> k ,
  L -> l ,
  l -> l ,
  M -> m ,
  m -> m ,
  N -> n ,
  n -> n ,
  Ŋ -> ŋ ,
  ŋ -> ŋ ,
  O -> u ː ,
  o -> u ː ,
  P -> p ,
  p -> p ,
  Q -> q ,
  q -> q ,
  R -> r ,
  r -> r ,
  S -> s ,
  s -> s ,
  T -> t ,
  t -> t ,
  U -> u ː ,
  u -> u ː ,
  V -> v ,
  v -> v ,
  W -> d ,
  w -> d ,
  X -> k s ,
  x -> k s ,
  Y -> y ː ,
  y -> y ː ,
  Z -> s ,
  z -> s ,
  Æ -> æ ː ,
  æ -> æ ː ,
  Ä -> æ ː ,
  ä -> æ ː ,
  Ø -> ø ː ,
  ø -> ø ː ,
  Ö -> ø ː ,
  ö -> ø ː ,
  Å -> ɔ ː ,
  å -> ɔ ː || .#. \[ ">" | ":" ]* _ \[ ">" | ":" ]*                               "_WORD" .#. ,
                                  _ \[ ">" | ":" ]* [ ">" | ":" ] \[ ">" | ":" ]+ "_WORD" .#. 
] ;

define vowelBeforeCase [
  A -> a,
  Á -> ɑ,
  á -> ɑ,
  E -> e,
  I -> i,
  O -> u,
  o -> u,
  U -> ʉ,
  Y -> y,
  Æ -> æ,
  Ø -> ø,
  Å -> ɔ || _ [ ">" | ":" ]   ,
              [ ">" | ":" ] _
] ;

! Acronyms ending in a consonant, old spelling
define Ccase [            ! No nom - they are both suffix-less
 v     -> a v ,          ! Sg Acc
 j     -> a j ,          ! Sg Ill, Pl Gen, Pl Com
 n     -> a n ,          ! Sg Ine, Ess
 s     -> a s ,          ! Sg Ela
 j n   -> a i n ,        ! Sg Com, Pl Ine
 j t   -> a i t ,        ! Pl Acc
 j d a -> a i d a ,      ! Pl Ill
 j s   -> a i s          ! Pl Ela
       || ICONS (ː) [ ">" | ":" ] _ ( "_WORD" ) .#.
] ;

! Acronyms ending in a vowel, old spelling
define Vcase [            ! No nom - they are both suffix-less
 v     -> v ,          ! Sg Acc
 j     -> j ,          ! Sg Ill, Pl Gen, Pl Com
 n     -> n ,          ! Sg Ine, Ess
 s     -> s ,          ! Sg Ela
 j n   -> i n ,        ! Sg Com, Pl Ine
 j t   -> i t ,        ! Pl Acc
 j d a -> i d a ,      ! Pl Ill
 j s   -> i s          ! Pl Ela
       || IVOWS (ː) [ ">" | ":" ] _ ( "_WORD" ) .#.
] ;

! Acronyms with new spelling - the binding vowel is spelled out:
define Newcase [            ! No nom - they are both suffix-less
 v     -> v ,          ! Sg Acc
 j     -> j ,          ! Sg Ill, Pl Gen, Pl Com
 n     -> n ,          ! Sg Ine, Ess
 s     -> s ,          ! Sg Ela
 j n   -> i n ,        ! Sg Com, Pl Ine
 j t   -> i t ,        ! Pl Acc
 j d a -> i d a ,      ! Pl Ill
 j s   -> i s          ! Pl Ela
       || [ ">" | ":" ] IVOWS _ ( "_WORD" ) .#.
] ;

define cleanup [
 ">" -> 0,
 ":" -> 0,
 "_WORD" -> 0
] ;

read regex [
      wordacromarker
  .o. letter2sound
  .o. word2sound
  .o. vowelBeforeCase
  .o. Ccase
  .o. Vcase
  .o. Newcase
  .o. cleanup
] ;


! KS>:av
